Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska72-222
School lands; acquisition by public districts; purposes.

Any irrigation district, rural water district, public power district or public power and irrigation district, or natural resources district may acquire from the state any educational land, portion thereof, or interest therein for the purpose for which such districts are authorized by law to condemn private lands in this state. In addition, a natural resources district may acquire an easement or right-of-way for the purpose of constructing, replacing, operating, and maintaining structures which are a part of the program of work of the district.

Laws 1923, c. 61, § 1, p. 185;

Laws 1925, c. 135, § 1, p. 354;

Laws 1929, c. 188, § 1, p. 652;

C.S.1929, § 72-211;

Laws 1931, c. 118, § 1, p. 345;

Laws 1935, c. 164, § 1, p. 611;

Laws 1941, c. 145, § 1, p. 576;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 72-211;

Laws 1943, c. 160, § 1, p. 574;

R.S.1943, § 72-222;

Laws 1963, Spec. Sess., c. 17, § 1, p. 148;

Laws 1965, c. 436, § 1, p. 1388;

Laws 1971, LB 513, § 1;

Laws 1977, LB 510, § 7.